Massachusetts, session 194th, H1453.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 29 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following
section:- Section 2RRRRR. (a) There shall be established within the board of higher education,
hereinafter the board, a separate fund to be known as the Caregiver to Adults with Disabilities
Fund. The fund shall be credited with: (1) revenue from appropriations or other money
authorized by the general court and specifically designated to be credited to the fund; (2) interest
earned on such revenue; and (3) funds from public and private sources and other gifts, grants and
donations. All amounts credited to the fund shall be used solely for activities and expenditures
consistent with the public purpose of the fund as set forth in subsection (b), including the
ordinary and necessary expenses of administration and operation associated with the fund. All
amounts credited to the fund shall be held in trust and shall be available for expenditure, without
of 2

further appropriation, by the board. Any unexpended balance in the fund at the close of a fiscal
year shall remain in the fund and shall be available for expenditure in subsequent fiscal years.
Annually, not later than December 1, the board shall issue a report to the clerks of the
house of representatives and the senate, the chairs of the house and senate committees on ways
and means, the chairs of the joint committee on education and the chairs of the joint committee
on children, families and persons with disabilities on the fund’s activities including, but not
limited to, amounts credited to the fund, amounts expended from the fund and any unexpended
balance.
(b) The board shall make expenditures from the fund for the purpose of furthering the
educational opportunities of those who serve as caregivers to adults with disabilities by
subsidizing tuition and fees for community college courses at eligible postsecondary institutions.
(c) The board shall promulgate regulations to effectuate the purposes of this section.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, not later than 14
days after the effective date of this act, the state comptroller shall transfer from the General Fund
$4,125,000 to the Caregiver to Adults with Disabilities Fund established in section 46 of chapter
15A.
of 2